California, session 20252026, AB1133.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 240 of the Harbors and Navigation Code is amended to read:240. The provisions of this Division, This division, in so far as they are it is not in conflict with the admiralty and maritime jurisdiction and laws of the United States, apply applies to navigation on the navigable waters of the United States, as well as States and to navigation on the navigable waters of this state.